Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,106
Grain moisture measuring devices; comparative tests; sealing or marking.

Whenever the supervisor of the grain warehouse department of the Public Service Commission, or his or her inspectors, compares grain moisture tests of the device being tested with the standard grain moisture measuring device and finds that they correspond or causes them to correspond with the standard, the supervisor, or his or her inspectors, shall seal or mark such grain moisture measuring testing device with appropriate seals or works. Any such grain moisture measuring testing device which upon such inspection shall be found to be defective shall be sealed or marked with an appropriate seal indicating such device to be defective and the owner or user of such device shall be notified in writing on the date of such inspection of such defective condition by the supervisor of the grain warehouse department, or his or her inspectors.

Laws 1978, LB 636, § 3.